Ohio, session 136, HB389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 4501.01 and 4503.10 of the 5
Revised Code be amended to read as follows: 6
Sec. 4501.01. As used in this chapter and Chapters 4503., 7
4505., 4507., 4509., 4510., 4511., 4513., 4515., and 4517. of 8
the Revised Code, and in the penal laws, except as otherwise 9
provided: 10
(A) "Vehicles" means everything on wheels or runners, 11
including motorized bicycles, but does not mean electric 12
personal assistive mobility devices, low-speed micromobility 13
devices, vehicles that are operated exclusively on rails or 14
tracks or from overhead electric trolley wires, and vehicles 15
that belong to any police department, municipal fire department, 16

H. B. No. 389 Page 2
As Introduced
or volunteer fire department, or that are used by such a 17
department in the discharge of its functions. 18
(B) "Motor vehicle" means any vehicle, including mobile 19
homes and recreational vehicles, that is propelled or drawn by 20
power other than muscular power or power collected from overhead 21
electric trolley wires. "Motor vehicle" does not include utility 22
vehicles as defined in division (VV) of this section, under- 23
speed vehicles as defined in division (XX) of this section, 24
mini-trucks as defined in division (BBB) of this section, 25
motorized bicycles, electric bicycles, road rollers, traction 26
engines, power shovels, power cranes, and other equipment used 27
in construction work and not designed for or employed in general 28
highway transportation, well-drilling machinery, ditch-digging 29
machinery, farm machinery, and trailers that are designed and 30
used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of storage 31
and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or towed on 32
a public road or highway for a distance of no more than ten 33
miles and at a speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less. 34
(C) "Agricultural tractor" and "traction engine" mean any 35
self-propelling vehicle that is designed or used for drawing 36
other vehicles or wheeled machinery, but has no provisions for 37
carrying loads independently of such other vehicles, and that is 38
used principally for agricultural purposes. 39
(D) "Commercial tractor," except as defined in division 40
(C) of this section, means any motor vehicle that has motive 41
power and either is designed or used for drawing other motor 42
vehicles, or is designed or used for drawing another motor 43
vehicle while carrying a portion of the other motor vehicle or 44
its load, or both. 45
(E) "Passenger car" means any motor vehicle that is 46

H. B. No. 389 Page 3
As Introduced
designed and used for carrying not more than nine persons and 47
includes any motor vehicle that is designed and used for 48
carrying not more than fifteen persons in a ridesharing 49
arrangement. 50
(F) "Collector's vehicle" means any motor vehicle or 51
agricultural tractor or traction engine that is of special 52
interest, that has a fair market value of one hundred dollars or 53
more, whether operable or not, and that is owned, operated, 54
collected, preserved, restored, maintained, or used essentially 55
as a collector's item, leisure pursuit, or investment, but not 56
as the owner's principal means of transportation. "Licensed 57
collector's vehicle" means a collector's vehicle, other than an 58
agricultural tractor or traction engine, that displays current, 59
valid license tags issued under section 4503.45 of the Revised 60
Code, or a similar type of motor vehicle that displays current, 61
valid license tags issued under substantially equivalent 62
provisions in the laws of other states. 63
(G) "Historical motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle 64
that is over twenty-five years old and is owned solely as a 65
collector's item and for participation in club activities, 66
exhibitions, tours, parades, and similar uses, but that in no 67
event is used for general transportation. 68
(H) "Noncommercial motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle, 69
including a farm truck as defined in section 4503.04 of the 70
Revised Code, that is designed by the manufacturer to carry a 71
load of no more than one ton and is used exclusively for 72
purposes other than engaging in business for profit. 73
(I) "Bus" means any motor vehicle that has motor power and 74
is designed and used for carrying more than nine passengers, 75
except any motor vehicle that is designed and used for carrying 76

H. B. No. 389 Page 4
As Introduced
not more than fifteen passengers in a ridesharing arrangement. 77
(J) "Commercial car" or "truck" means any motor vehicle 78
that has motor power and is designed and used for carrying 79
merchandise or freight, or that is used as a commercial tractor. 80
(K) "Bicycle" means every device, other than a device that 81
is designed solely for use as a play vehicle by a child, that is 82
propelled solely by human power upon which a person may ride, 83
and that has two or more wheels, any of which is more than 84
fourteen inches in diameter. 85
(L) "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" means any vehicle that 86
either has two tandem wheels or one wheel in the front and two 87
wheels in the rear, that may be pedaled, and that is equipped 88
with a helper motor of not more than fifty cubic centimeters 89
piston displacement that produces no more than one brake 90
horsepower and is capable of propelling the vehicle at a speed 91
of no greater than twenty miles per hour on a level surface. 92
"Motorized bicycle" or "moped" does not include an electric 93
bicycle. 94
(M) "Trailer" means any vehicle without motive power that 95
is designed or used for carrying property or persons wholly on 96
its own structure and for being drawn by a motor vehicle, and 97
includes any such vehicle that is formed by or operated as a 98
combination of a semitrailer and a vehicle of the dolly type 99
such as that commonly known as a trailer dolly, a vehicle used 100
to transport agricultural produce or agricultural production 101
materials between a local place of storage or supply and the 102
farm when drawn or towed on a public road or highway at a speed 103
greater than twenty-five miles per hour, and a vehicle that is 104
designed and used exclusively to transport a boat between a 105
place of storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when 106

H. B. No. 389 Page 5
As Introduced
drawn or towed on a public road or highway for a distance of 107
more than ten miles or at a speed of more than twenty-five miles 108
per hour. "Trailer" does not include a manufactured home or 109
travel trailer. 110
(N) "Noncommercial trailer" means any trailer, except a 111
travel trailer or trailer that is used to transport a boat as 112
described in division (B) of this section, but, where 113
applicable, includes a vehicle that is used to transport a boat 114
as described in division (M) of this section, that has a gross 115
weight of no more than ten thousand pounds, and that is used 116
exclusively for purposes other than engaging in business for a 117
profit, such as the transportation of personal items for 118
personal or recreational purposes. 119
(O) "Mobile home" means a building unit or assembly of 120
closed construction that is fabricated in an off-site facility, 121
is more than thirty-five body feet in length or, when erected on 122
site, is three hundred twenty or more square feet, is built on a 123
permanent chassis, is transportable in one or more sections, and 124
does not qualify as a manufactured home as defined in division 125
(C)(4) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code or as an 126
industrialized unit as defined in division (C)(3) of section 127
3781.06 of the Revised Code. 128
(P) "Semitrailer" means any vehicle of the trailer type 129
that does not have motive power and is so designed or used with 130
another and separate motor vehicle that in operation a part of 131
its own weight or that of its load, or both, rests upon and is 132
carried by the other vehicle furnishing the motive power for 133
propelling itself and the vehicle referred to in this division, 134
and includes, for the purpose only of registration and taxation 135
under those chapters, any vehicle of the dolly type, such as a 136

H. B. No. 389 Page 6
As Introduced
trailer dolly, that is designed or used for the conversion of a 137
semitrailer into a trailer. 138
(Q) "Recreational vehicle" means a vehicular portable 139
structure that meets all of the following conditions: 140
(1) It is designed for the sole purpose of recreational 141
travel. 142
(2) It is not used for the purpose of engaging in business 143
for profit. 144
(3) It is not used for the purpose of engaging in 145
intrastate commerce. 146
(4) It is not used for the purpose of commerce as defined 147
in 49 C.F.R. 383.5, as amended. 148
(5) It is not regulated by the public utilities commission 149
pursuant to Chapter 4905., 4921., or 4923. of the Revised Code. 150
(6) It is classed as one of the following: 151
(a) "Travel trailer" or "house vehicle" means a nonself- 152
propelled recreational vehicle that does not exceed an overall 153
length of forty feet, exclusive of bumper and tongue or 154
coupling. "Travel trailer" includes a tent-type fold-out camping 155
trailer as defined in section 4517.01 of the Revised Code. 156
(b) "Motor home" means a self-propelled recreational 157
vehicle that has no fifth wheel and is constructed with 158
permanently installed facilities for cold storage, cooking and 159
consuming of food, and for sleeping. 160
(c) "Truck camper" means a nonself-propelled recreational 161
vehicle that does not have wheels for road use and is designed 162
to be placed upon and attached to a motor vehicle. "Truck 163

H. B. No. 389 Page 7
As Introduced
camper" does not include truck covers that consist of walls and 164
a roof, but do not have floors and facilities enabling them to 165
be used as a dwelling. 166
(d) "Fifth wheel trailer" means a vehicle that is of such 167
size and weight as to be movable without a special highway 168
permit, that is constructed with a raised forward section that 169
allows a bi-level floor plan, and that is designed to be towed 170
by a vehicle equipped with a fifth-wheel hitch ordinarily 171
installed in the bed of a truck. 172
(e) "Park trailer" means a vehicle that is commonly known 173
as a park model recreational vehicle, meets the American 174
national standard institute standard A119.5 (1988) for park 175
trailers, is built on a single chassis, has a gross trailer area 176
of four hundred square feet or less when set up, is designed for 177
seasonal or temporary living quarters, and may be connected to 178
utilities necessary for the operation of installed features and 179
appliances. 180
(R) "Pneumatic tires" means tires of rubber and fabric or 181
tires of similar material, that are inflated with air. 182
(S) "Solid tires" means tires of rubber or similar elastic 183
material that are not dependent upon confined air for support of 184
the load. 185
(T) "Solid tire vehicle" means any vehicle that is 186
equipped with two or more solid tires. 187
(U) "Farm machinery" means all machines and tools that are 188
used in the production, harvesting, and care of farm products, 189
and includes trailers that are used to transport agricultural 190
produce or agricultural production materials between a local 191
place of storage or supply and the farm, agricultural tractors, 192

H. B. No. 389 Page 8
As Introduced
threshing machinery, hay-baling machinery, corn shellers, 193
hammermills, and machinery used in the production of 194
horticultural, agricultural, and vegetable products. 195
(V) "Owner" includes any person or firm, other than a 196
manufacturer or dealer, that has title to a motor vehicle, 197
except that, in sections 4505.01 to 4505.19 of the Revised Code, 198
"owner" includes in addition manufacturers and dealers. 199
(W) "Manufacturer" and "dealer" include all persons and 200
firms that are regularly engaged in the business of 201
manufacturing, selling, displaying, offering for sale, or 202
dealing in motor vehicles, at an established place of business 203
that is used exclusively for the purpose of manufacturing, 204
selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in motor 205
vehicles. A place of business that is used for manufacturing, 206
selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in motor 207
vehicles shall be deemed to be used exclusively for those 208
purposes even though snowmobiles or all-purpose vehicles are 209
sold or displayed for sale thereat, even though farm machinery 210
is sold or displayed for sale thereat, or even though repair, 211
accessory, gasoline and oil, storage, parts, service, or paint 212
departments are maintained thereat, or, in any county having a 213
population of less than seventy-five thousand at the last 214
federal census, even though a department in a place of business 215
is used to dismantle, salvage, or rebuild motor vehicles by 216
means of used parts, if such departments are operated for the 217
purpose of furthering and assisting in the business of 218
manufacturing, selling, displaying, offering for sale, or 219
dealing in motor vehicles. Places of business or departments in 220
a place of business used to dismantle, salvage, or rebuild motor 221
vehicles by means of using used parts are not considered as 222
being maintained for the purpose of assisting or furthering the 223

H. B. No. 389 Page 9
As Introduced
manufacturing, selling, displaying, and offering for sale or 224
dealing in motor vehicles. 225
(X) "Operator" includes any person who drives or operates 226
a motor vehicle upon the public highways. 227
(Y) "Chauffeur" means any operator who operates a motor 228
vehicle, other than a taxicab, as an employee for hire; or any 229
operator whether or not the owner of a motor vehicle, other than 230
a taxicab, who operates such vehicle for transporting, for gain, 231
compensation, or profit, either persons or property owned by 232
another. Any operator of a motor vehicle who is voluntarily 233
involved in a ridesharing arrangement is not considered an 234
employee for hire or operating such vehicle for gain, 235
compensation, or profit. 236
(Z) "State" includes the territories and federal districts 237
of the United States, and the provinces of Canada. 238
(AA) "Public roads and highways" for vehicles includes all 239
public thoroughfares, bridges, and culverts. 240
(BB) "Manufacturer's number" means the manufacturer's 241
original serial number that is affixed to or imprinted upon the 242
chassis or other part of the motor vehicle. 243
(CC) "Motor number" means the manufacturer's original 244
number that is affixed to or imprinted upon the engine or motor 245
of the vehicle. 246
(DD) "Distributor" means any person who is authorized by a 247
motor vehicle manufacturer to distribute new motor vehicles to 248
licensed motor vehicle dealers at an established place of 249
business that is used exclusively for the purpose of 250
distributing new motor vehicles to licensed motor vehicle 251
dealers, except when the distributor also is a new motor vehicle 252

H. B. No. 389 Page 10
As Introduced
dealer, in which case the distributor may distribute at the 253
location of the distributor's licensed dealership. 254
(EE) "Ridesharing arrangement" means the transportation of 255
persons in a motor vehicle where the transportation is 256
incidental to another purpose of a volunteer driver and includes 257
ridesharing arrangements known as carpools, vanpools, and 258
buspools. 259
(FF) "Apportionable vehicle" means any vehicle that is 260
used or intended for use in two or more international 261
registration plan member jurisdictions that allocate or 262
proportionally register vehicles, that is used for the 263
transportation of persons for hire or designed, used, or 264
maintained primarily for the transportation of property, and 265
that meets any of the following qualifications: 266
(1) Is a power unit having a gross vehicle weight in 267
excess of twenty-six thousand pounds; 268
(2) Is a power unit having three or more axles, regardless 269
of the gross vehicle weight; 270
(3) Is a combination vehicle with a gross vehicle weight 271
in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds. 272
"Apportionable vehicle" does not include recreational 273
vehicles, vehicles displaying restricted plates, city pick-up 274
and delivery vehicles, or vehicles owned and operated by the 275
United States, this state, or any political subdivisions 276
thereof. 277
(GG) "Chartered party" means a group of persons who 278
contract as a group to acquire the exclusive use of a passenger- 279
carrying motor vehicle at a fixed charge for the vehicle in 280
accordance with the carrier's tariff, lawfully on file with the 281

H. B. No. 389 Page 11
As Introduced
United States department of transportation, for the purpose of 282
group travel to a specified destination or for a particular 283
itinerary, either agreed upon in advance or modified by the 284
chartered group after having left the place of origin. 285
(HH) "International registration plan" means a reciprocal 286
agreement of member jurisdictions that is endorsed by the 287
American association of motor vehicle administrators, and that 288
promotes and encourages the fullest possible use of the highway 289
system by authorizing apportioned registration of fleets of 290
vehicles and recognizing registration of vehicles apportioned in 291
member jurisdictions. 292
(II) "Restricted plate" means a license plate that has a 293
restriction of time, geographic area, mileage, or commodity, and 294
includes license plates issued to farm trucks under division (J) 295
of section 4503.04 of the Revised Code. 296
(JJ) "Gross vehicle weight," with regard to any commercial 297
car, trailer, semitrailer, or bus that is taxed at the rates 298
established under section 4503.042 or 4503.65 of the Revised 299
Code, means the unladen weight of the vehicle fully equipped 300
plus the maximum weight of the load to be carried on the 301
vehicle. 302
(KK) "Combined gross vehicle weight" with regard to any 303
combination of a commercial car, trailer, and semitrailer, that 304
is taxed at the rates established under section 4503.042 or 305
4503.65 of the Revised Code, means the total unladen weight of 306
the combination of vehicles fully equipped plus the maximum 307
weight of the load to be carried on that combination of 308
vehicles. 309
(LL) "Chauffeured limousine" means a motor vehicle that is 310

H. B. No. 389 Page 12
As Introduced
designed to carry nine or fewer passengers and is operated for 311
hire pursuant to a prearranged contract for the transportation 312
of passengers on public roads and highways along a route under 313
the control of the person hiring the vehicle and not over a 314
defined and regular route. "Prearranged contract" means an 315
agreement, made in advance of boarding, to provide 316
transportation from a specific location in a chauffeured 317
limousine. "Chauffeured limousine" does not include any vehicle 318
that is used exclusively in the business of funeral directing. 319
(MM) "Manufactured home" has the same meaning as in 320
division (C)(4) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code. 321
(NN) "Acquired situs," with respect to a manufactured home 322
or a mobile home, means to become located in this state by the 323
placement of the home on real property, but does not include the 324
placement of a manufactured home or a mobile home in the 325
inventory of a new motor vehicle dealer or the inventory of a 326
manufacturer, remanufacturer, or distributor of manufactured or 327
mobile homes. 328
(OO) "Electronic" includes electrical, digital, magnetic, 329
optical, electromagnetic, or any other form of technology that 330
entails capabilities similar to these technologies. 331
(PP) "Electronic record" means a record generated, 332
communicated, received, or stored by electronic means for use in 333
an information system or for transmission from one information 334
system to another. 335
(QQ) "Electronic signature" means a signature in 336
electronic form attached to or logically associated with an 337
electronic record. 338
(RR) "Financial transaction device" has the same meaning 339

H. B. No. 389 Page 13
As Introduced
as in division (A) of section 113.40 of the Revised Code. 340
(SS) "Electronic motor vehicle dealer" means a motor 341
vehicle dealer licensed under Chapter 4517. of the Revised Code 342
whom the registrar of motor vehicles determines meets the 343
criteria designated in section 4503.035 of the Revised Code for 344
electronic motor vehicle dealers and designates as an electronic 345
motor vehicle dealer under that section. 346
(TT) "Electric personal assistive mobility device" means a 347
self-balancing two non-tandem wheeled device that is designed to 348
transport only one person, has an electric propulsion system of 349
an average of seven hundred fifty watts, and when ridden on a 350
paved level surface by an operator who weighs one hundred 351
seventy pounds has a maximum speed of less than twenty miles per 352
hour. 353
(UU) "Limited driving privileges" means the privilege to 354
operate a motor vehicle that a court grants under section 355
4510.021 of the Revised Code to a person whose driver's or 356
commercial driver's license or permit or nonresident operating 357
privilege has been suspended. 358
(VV) "Utility vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle 359
designed with a bed, principally for the purpose of transporting 360
material or cargo in connection with construction, agricultural, 361
forestry, grounds maintenance, lawn and garden, materials 362
handling, or similar activities. 363
(WW) "Low-speed vehicle" means a three- or four-wheeled 364
motor vehicle with an attainable speed in one mile on a paved 365
level surface of more than twenty miles per hour but not more 366
than twenty-five miles per hour and with a gross vehicle weight 367
rating less than three thousand pounds. 368

H. B. No. 389 Page 14
As Introduced
(XX) "Under-speed vehicle" means a three- or four-wheeled 369
vehicle, including a vehicle commonly known as a golf cart, with 370
an attainable speed on a paved level surface of not more than 371
twenty miles per hour and with a gross vehicle weight rating 372
less than three thousand pounds. 373
(YY) "Motor-driven cycle or motor scooter" means any 374
vehicle designed to travel on not more than three wheels in 375
contact with the ground, with a seat for the driver and floor 376
pad for the driver's feet, and is equipped with a motor with a 377
piston displacement between fifty and one hundred cubic 378
centimeters piston displacement that produces not more than five 379
brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the vehicle at a 380
speed greater than twenty miles per hour on a level surface. 381
(ZZ) "Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle with motive power 382
having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator, designed to 383
travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, 384
and having no occupant compartment top or occupant compartment 385
top that can be installed or removed by the user. 386
(AAA) "Cab-enclosed motorcycle" means a motor vehicle with 387
motive power having a seat or saddle for the use of the 388
operator, designed to travel on not more than three wheels in 389
contact with the ground, and having an occupant compartment top 390
or an occupant compartment top that is installed. 391
(BBB) "Mini-truck" means a vehicle that has four wheels, 392
is propelled by an electric motor with a rated power of seven 393
thousand five hundred watts or less or an internal combustion 394
engine with a piston displacement capacity of six hundred sixty 395
cubic centimeters or less, has a total dry weight of nine 396
hundred to two thousand two hundred pounds, contains an enclosed 397
cabin and a seat for the vehicle operator, resembles a pickup 398

H. B. No. 389 Page 15
As Introduced
truck or van with a cargo area or bed located at the rear of the 399
vehicle, and was not originally manufactured to meet federal 400
motor vehicle safety standards. 401
(CCC) "Autocycle" means a three-wheeled motorcycle that is 402
manufactured to comply with federal safety requirements for 403
motorcycles and that is equipped with safety belts, a steering 404
wheel, and seating that does not require the operator to 405
straddle or sit astride to ride the motorcycle. 406
(DDD) "Plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle" means a 407
passenger car powered in part by a battery cell energy system 408
that can be recharged via an external source of electricity. 409
(EEE) "Hybrid motor vehicle" means a passenger car powered 410
by an internal propulsion system consisting of both of the 411
following: 412
(1) A combustion engine; 413
(2) A battery cell energy system that cannot be recharged 414
via an external source of electricity but can be recharged by 415
other vehicle mechanisms that capture and store electric energy. 416
(FFF) "Low-speed micromobility device" means a device 417
weighing less than one hundred pounds that has handlebars, is 418
propelled by an electric motor or human power, and has an 419
attainable speed on a paved level surface of not more than 420
twenty miles per hour when propelled by the electric motor. 421
(GGG)(FFF) "Specialty license plate" means a license 422
plate, authorized by the general assembly, that displays a 423
combination of words, markings, logos, or other graphic artwork 424
that is in addition to the words, images, and distinctive 425
numbers and letters required by section 4503.22 of the Revised 426
Code. 427

H. B. No. 389 Page 16
As Introduced
(HHH)(GGG) "Battery electric motor vehicle" means a 428
passenger car powered wholly by a battery cell energy system 429
that can be recharged via an external source of electricity. 430
(III)(HHH) "Adaptive mobility vehicle" means either a new 431
passenger car or bus purchased from a new motor vehicle dealer 432
or a used passenger car or bus, provided that such passenger car 433
or bus is designed, modified, or equipped to enable an 434
individual with a disability to operate or to be transported in 435
the passenger car or bus, in accordance with 49 C.F.R. part 568 436
or 595, and contains at least one of the following: 437
(1) An electronic or mechanical lift that enables a person 438
to enter or exit the motor vehicle while occupying a wheelchair 439
or scooter; 440
(2) An electronic or mechanical wheelchair ramp; 441
(3) A system to secure a wheelchair or scooter in order to 442
allow a person to operate or be transported safely while 443
occupying that wheelchair or scooter. 444
Sec. 4503.10. (A) The owner of every snowmobile, off- 445
highway motorcycle, and all-purpose vehicle required to be 446
registered under section 4519.02 of the Revised Code shall file 447
an application for registration under section 4519.03 of the 448
Revised Code. The owner of a motor vehicle, other than a 449
snowmobile, off-highway motorcycle, or all-purpose vehicle, that 450
is not designed and constructed by the manufacturer for 451
operation on a street or highway may not register it under this 452
chapter except upon certification of inspection pursuant to 453
section 4513.02 of the Revised Code by the sheriff, or the chief 454
of police of the municipal corporation or township, with 455
jurisdiction over the political subdivision in which the owner 456

H. B. No. 389 Page 17
As Introduced
of the motor vehicle resides. Except as provided in sections 457
4503.103 and 4503.107 of the Revised Code, every owner of every 458
other motor vehicle not previously described in this section and 459
every person mentioned as owner in the last certificate of title 460
of a motor vehicle that is operated or driven upon the public 461
roads or highways shall cause to be filed each year, by mail or 462
otherwise, in the office of the registrar of motor vehicles or a 463
deputy registrar, a written or electronic application or a 464
preprinted registration renewal notice issued under section 465
4503.102 of the Revised Code, the form of which shall be 466
prescribed by the registrar, for registration for the following 467
registration year, which shall begin on the first day of January 468
of every calendar year and end on the thirty-first day of 469
December in the same year. Applications for registration and 470
registration renewal notices shall be filed at the times 471
established by the registrar pursuant to section 4503.101 of the 472
Revised Code. A motor vehicle owner also may elect to apply for 473
or renew a motor vehicle registration by electronic means using 474
electronic signature in accordance with rules adopted by the 475
registrar. Except as provided in division (J) of this section, 476
applications for registration shall be made on blanks furnished 477
by the registrar for that purpose, containing the following 478
information: 479
(1) A brief description of the motor vehicle to be 480
registered, including the year, make, model, and vehicle 481
identification number, and, in the case of commercial cars, the 482
gross weight of the vehicle fully equipped computed in the 483
manner prescribed in section 4503.08 of the Revised Code; 484
(2) The name and residence address of the owner, and the 485
township and municipal corporation in which the owner resides; 486

H. B. No. 389 Page 18
As Introduced
(3) The district of registration, which shall be 487
determined as follows: 488
(a) In case the motor vehicle to be registered is used for 489
hire or principally in connection with any established business 490
or branch business, conducted at a particular place, the 491
district of registration is the municipal corporation in which 492
that place is located or, if not located in any municipal 493
corporation, the county and township in which that place is 494
located. 495
(b) In case the vehicle is not so used, the district of 496
registration is the municipal corporation or county in which the 497
owner resides at the time of making the application. 498
(4) Whether the motor vehicle is a new or used motor 499
vehicle; 500
(5) The date of purchase of the motor vehicle; 501
(6) Whether the fees required to be paid for the 502
registration or transfer of the motor vehicle, during the 503
preceding registration year and during the preceding period of 504
the current registration year, have been paid. Each application 505
for registration shall be signed by the owner, either manually 506
or by electronic signature, or pursuant to obtaining a limited 507
power of attorney authorized by the registrar for registration, 508
or other document authorizing such signature. If the owner 509
elects to apply for or renew the motor vehicle registration with 510
the registrar by electronic means, the owner's manual signature 511
is not required. 512
(7) The owner's social security number, driver's license 513
number, or state identification number, or, where a motor 514
vehicle to be registered is used for hire or principally in 515

H. B. No. 389 Page 19
As Introduced
connection with any established business, the owner's federal 516
taxpayer identification number. The bureau of motor vehicles 517
shall retain in its records all social security numbers provided 518
under this section, but the bureau shall not place social 519
security numbers on motor vehicle certificates of registration. 520
(8) Whether the applicant wishes to certify willingness to 521
make an anatomical gift if an applicant has not so certified 522
under section 2108.05 of the Revised Code. The applicant's 523
response shall not be considered in the decision of whether to 524
approve the application for registration. 525
(B)(1) When an applicant first registers a motor vehicle 526
in the applicant's name, the applicant shall provide proof of 527
ownership of that motor vehicle. Proof of ownership may include 528
any of the following: 529
(a) The applicant may present for inspection a physical 530
certificate of title or memorandum certificate showing title to 531
the motor vehicle to be registered in the name of the applicant. 532
(b) The applicant may present for inspection an electronic 533
certificate of title for the applicant's motor vehicle in a 534
manner prescribed by rules adopted by the registrar. 535
(c) The registrar or deputy registrar may electronically 536
confirm the applicant's ownership of the motor vehicle. 537
An applicant is not required to present a certificate of 538
title to an electronic motor vehicle dealer acting as a limited 539
authority deputy registrar in accordance with rules adopted by 540
the registrar. 541
(2) When a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance 542
program is in effect under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code 543
and rules adopted under it, each application for registration 544

H. B. No. 389 Page 20
As Introduced
for a vehicle required to be inspected under that section and 545
those rules shall be accompanied by an inspection certificate 546
for the motor vehicle issued in accordance with that section. 547
(3) An application for registration shall be refused if 548
any of the following applies: 549
(a) The application is not in proper form. 550
(b) The application is prohibited from being accepted by 551
division (D) of section 2935.27, division (A) of section 552
2937.221, division (A) of section 4503.13, division (B) of 553
section 4510.22, division (B)(1) of section 4521.10, or division 554
(B) of section 5537.041 of the Revised Code. 555
(c) Proof of ownership is required but is not presented or 556
confirmed in accordance with division (B)(1) of this section. 557
(d) All registration and transfer fees for the motor 558
vehicle, for the preceding year or the preceding period of the 559
current registration year, have not been paid. 560
(e) The owner or lessee does not have an inspection 561
certificate for the motor vehicle as provided in section 3704.14 562
of the Revised Code, and rules adopted under it, if that section 563
is applicable. 564
(4) This section does not require the payment of license 565
or registration taxes on a motor vehicle for any preceding year, 566
or for any preceding period of a year, if the motor vehicle was 567
not taxable for that preceding year or period under sections 568
4503.02, 4503.04, 4503.11, 4503.12, and 4503.16 or Chapter 4504. 569
of the Revised Code. 570
(5) When a certificate of registration is issued upon the 571
first registration of a motor vehicle by or on behalf of the 572

H. B. No. 389 Page 21
As Introduced
owner, the official issuing the certificate shall indicate the 573
issuance with a stamp on the certificate of title or memorandum 574
certificate or, in the case of an electronic certificate of 575
title or electronic verification of ownership, an electronic 576
stamp or other notation as specified in rules adopted by the 577
registrar, and with a stamp on the inspection certificate for 578
the motor vehicle, if any. 579
(6) The official also shall indicate, by a stamp or by 580
other means the registrar prescribes, on the registration 581
certificate issued upon the first registration of a motor 582
vehicle by or on behalf of the owner the odometer reading of the 583
motor vehicle as shown in the odometer statement included in or 584
attached to the certificate of title. Upon each subsequent 585
registration of the motor vehicle by or on behalf of the same 586
owner, the official also shall so indicate the odometer reading 587
of the motor vehicle as shown on the immediately preceding 588
certificate of registration. 589
(7) The registrar shall include in the permanent 590
registration record of any vehicle required to be inspected 591
under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code the inspection 592
certificate number from the inspection certificate that is 593
presented at the time of registration of the vehicle as required 594
under this division. 595
(C)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(1) of 596
this section, the registrar and each deputy registrar shall 597
collect an additional fee of eleven dollars for each application 598
for registration and registration renewal received. For vehicles 599
specified in divisions (A)(1) to (21) of section 4503.042 of the 600
Revised Code, the registrar and deputy registrar shall collect 601
an additional fee of thirty dollars for each application for 602

H. B. No. 389 Page 22
As Introduced
registration and registration renewal received. No additional 603
fee shall be charged for vehicles registered under section 604
4503.65 of the Revised Code. The additional fee is for the 605
purpose of defraying the department of public safety's costs 606
associated with the administration and enforcement of the motor 607
vehicle and traffic laws of Ohio. Each deputy registrar shall 608
transmit the fees collected under divisions (C)(1) and (3) of 609
this section in the time and manner provided in this section. 610
The registrar shall deposit all moneys received under division 611
(C)(1) of this section into the public safety - highway purposes 612
fund established in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. 613
(2) In addition, a charge of twenty-five cents shall be 614
made for each reflectorized safety license plate issued, and a 615
single charge of twenty-five cents shall be made for each county 616
identification sticker or each set of county identification 617
stickers issued, as the case may be, to cover the cost of 618
producing the license plates and stickers, including material, 619
manufacturing, and administrative costs. Those fees shall be in 620
addition to the license tax. If the total cost of producing the 621
plates is less than twenty-five cents per plate, or if the total 622
cost of producing the stickers is less than twenty-five cents 623
per sticker or per set issued, any excess moneys accruing from 624
the fees shall be distributed in the same manner as provided by 625
section 4501.04 of the Revised Code for the distribution of 626
license tax moneys. If the total cost of producing the plates 627
exceeds twenty-five cents per plate, or if the total cost of 628
producing the stickers exceeds twenty-five cents per sticker or 629
per set issued, the difference shall be paid from the license 630
tax moneys collected pursuant to section 4503.02 of the Revised 631
Code. 632
(3) The registrar and each deputy registrar shall collect 633

H. B. No. 389 Page 23
As Introduced
the following additional fee, as applicable, for each 634
application for registration or registration renewal received 635
for any hybrid motor vehicle, plug-in hybrid electric motor 636
vehicle, or battery electric motor vehicle: 637
(a) One hundred dollars for a hybrid motor vehicle; 638
(b) One hundred fifty dollars for a plug-in hybrid 639
electric motor vehicle; 640
(c)(b) Two hundred dollars for a battery electric motor 641
vehicle. 642
Each fee imposed under this division shall be prorated 643
based on the number of months for which the vehicle is 644
registered. The registrar shall transmit all money arising from 645
each fee to the treasurer of state for distribution in 646
accordance with division (E) of section 5735.051 of the Revised 647
Code, subject to division (D) of section 5735.05 of the Revised 648
Code. 649
(D) Each deputy registrar shall be allowed a fee equal to 650
the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised 651
Code for each application for registration and registration 652
renewal notice the deputy registrar receives, which shall be for 653
the purpose of compensating the deputy registrar for the deputy 654
registrar's services, and such office and rental expenses, as 655
may be necessary for the proper discharge of the deputy 656
registrar's duties in the receiving of applications and renewal 657
notices and the issuing of registrations. 658
(E) Upon the certification of the registrar, the county 659
sheriff or local police officials shall recover license plates 660
erroneously or fraudulently issued. 661
(F) Each deputy registrar, upon receipt of any application 662

H. B. No. 389 Page 24
As Introduced
for registration or registration renewal notice, together with 663
the license fee and any local motor vehicle license tax levied 664
pursuant to Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, shall transmit 665
that fee and tax, if any, in the manner provided in this 666
section, together with the original and duplicate copy of the 667
application, to the registrar. The registrar, subject to the 668
approval of the director of public safety, may deposit the funds 669
collected by those deputies in a local bank or depository to the 670
credit of the "state of Ohio, bureau of motor vehicles." Where a 671
local bank or depository has been designated by the registrar, 672
each deputy registrar shall deposit all moneys collected by the 673
deputy registrar into that bank or depository not more than one 674
business day after their collection and shall make reports to 675
the registrar of the amounts so deposited, together with any 676
other information, some of which may be prescribed by the 677
treasurer of state, as the registrar may require and as 678
prescribed by the registrar by rule. The registrar, within three 679
days after receipt of notification of the deposit of funds by a 680
deputy registrar in a local bank or depository, shall draw on 681
that account in favor of the treasurer of state. The registrar, 682
subject to the approval of the director and the treasurer of 683
state, may make reasonable rules necessary for the prompt 684
transmittal of fees and for safeguarding the interests of the 685
state and of counties, townships, municipal corporations, and 686
transportation improvement districts levying local motor vehicle 687
license taxes. The registrar may pay service charges usually 688
collected by banks and depositories for such service. If deputy 689
registrars are located in communities where banking facilities 690
are not available, they shall transmit the fees forthwith, by 691
money order or otherwise, as the registrar, by rule approved by 692
the director and the treasurer of state, may prescribe. The 693
registrar may pay the usual and customary fees for such service. 694

H. B. No. 389 Page 25
As Introduced
(G) This section does not prevent any person from making 695
an application for a motor vehicle license directly to the 696
registrar by mail, by electronic means, or in person at any of 697
the registrar's offices, upon payment of a service fee equal to 698
the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised 699
Code for each application. 700
(H) No person shall make a false statement as to the 701
district of registration in an application required by division 702
(A) of this section. Violation of this division is falsification 703
under section 2921.13 of the Revised Code and punishable as 704
specified in that section. 705
(I)(1) Where applicable, the requirements of division (B) 706
of this section relating to the presentation of an inspection 707
certificate issued under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and 708
rules adopted under it for a motor vehicle, the refusal of a 709
license for failure to present an inspection certificate, and 710
the stamping of the inspection certificate by the official 711
issuing the certificate of registration apply to the 712
registration of and issuance of license plates for a motor 713
vehicle under sections 4503.102, 4503.12, 4503.14, 4503.15, 714
4503.16, 4503.171, 4503.172, 4503.19, 4503.40, 4503.41, 4503.42, 715
4503.43, 4503.44, 4503.46, 4503.47, and 4503.51 of the Revised 716
Code. 717
(2)(a) The registrar shall adopt rules ensuring that each 718
owner registering a motor vehicle in a county where a motor 719
vehicle inspection and maintenance program is in effect under 720
section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it 721
receives information about the requirements established in that 722
section and those rules and about the need in those counties to 723
present an inspection certificate with an application for 724

H. B. No. 389 Page 26
As Introduced
registration or preregistration. 725
(b) Upon request, the registrar shall provide the director 726
of environmental protection, or any person that has been awarded 727
a contract under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code, an on-line 728
computer data link to registration information for all passenger 729
cars, noncommercial motor vehicles, and commercial cars that are 730
subject to that section. The registrar also shall provide to the 731
director of environmental protection a magnetic data tape 732
containing registration information regarding passenger cars, 733
noncommercial motor vehicles, and commercial cars for which a 734
multi-year registration is in effect under section 4503.103 of 735
the Revised Code or rules adopted under it, including, without 736
limitation, the date of issuance of the multi-year registration, 737
the registration deadline established under rules adopted under 738
section 4503.101 of the Revised Code that was applicable in the 739
year in which the multi-year registration was issued, and the 740
registration deadline for renewal of the multi-year 741
registration. 742
(J) Subject to division (K) of this section, application 743
for registration under the international registration plan, as 744
set forth in sections 4503.60 to 4503.66 of the Revised Code, 745
shall be made to the registrar on forms furnished by the 746
registrar. In accordance with international registration plan 747
guidelines and pursuant to rules adopted by the registrar, the 748
forms shall include the following: 749
(1) A uniform mileage schedule; 750
(2) The gross vehicle weight of the vehicle or combined 751
gross vehicle weight of the combination vehicle as declared by 752
the registrant; 753

H. B. No. 389 Page 27
As Introduced
(3) Any other information the registrar requires by rule. 754
(K) The registrar shall determine the feasibility of 755
implementing an electronic commercial fleet licensing and 756
management program that will enable the owners of commercial 757
tractors, commercial trailers, and commercial semitrailers to 758
conduct electronic transactions by July 1, 2010, or sooner. If 759
the registrar determines that implementing such a program is 760
feasible, the registrar shall adopt new rules under this 761
division or amend existing rules adopted under this division as 762
necessary in order to respond to advances in technology. 763
If international registration plan guidelines and 764
provisions allow member jurisdictions to permit applications for 765
registrations under the international registration plan to be 766
made via the internet, the rules the registrar adopts under this 767
division shall permit such action. 768
Section 2. That existing sections 4501.01 and 4503.10 of 769
the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 770